Utah statutes.
69-4-1.   Telecommunication network review.

(1)  Before the creation, expansion, or upgrade of a state-owned or state-funded telecommunication network, whether voice, data, or video transmission, the agency or entity proposing any change shall submit a plan to the governor detailing the proposed changes.

(2)  If, after consultation with the agency or entity it is the opinion of the governor that implementation of the plan would result in significant impact on telephone ratepayers, the governor shall direct the Public Service Commission to prepare an advisory report detailing how implementing the plan will affect telephone ratepayers where the plan would be in effect.

(3) (a)  The Public Service Commission shall complete and provide the advisory report to the governor, the agency or entity involved, and the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee within 60 days after receiving the governor's request.

(b)  The Public Service Commission may not conduct any public hearings or proceedings in the preparation of the report.

